nb: Klær og tilbehør > Skotilbehør > Brodder: Sklisikre pads under sko; Brodder; Ekstra pigger og knotter; Friksjonsspray og harpiks
pl: Ubrania i akcesoria > Akcesoria do butów > Nakładki na buty: Samoprzylepne podkładki antypoślizgowe; Raczki i nakładki antypoślizgowe na buty; Wymienne wkręty i kolce; Antypoślizgowe spraye i kalafonia
pt-PT: Acessórios e vestuário > Acessórios para calçado > Acessórios de aderência para calçado: Almofadas e fitas antiderrapantes adesivas; Grampos de gelo e neve; Pitões e pregos de substituição; Sprays e resinas de tração
fr: Vêtements et accessoires > Accessoires pour chaussures > Crampons de chaussures: Patins antidérapants adhésifs; Crampons à neige et à glace; Crampons et pointes de rechange; Sprays d’adhérence et colophane
sk-SK: Oblečenie a doplnky > Doplnky obuvi > Protišmykové podrážky: Lepiace podložky a nášľapy; Protišmykové návleky na obuv do ľadu a snehu; Náhradné čapy a hroty; Trakčné spreje a kolofónia
hu: Ruházat és kiegészítők > Cipőkiegészítők > Cipőfogantyúk: Öntapadós csúszásgátló talpak; Jég- és hócsúszásgátlók; Csere stoplik és szögek; Tapadásnövelő spray-k és gyanták
zh-CN: 服饰与配饰 > 鞋类配饰 > 防滑鞋夹: 自粘防滑贴与防滑鞋底; 冰雪防滑鞋钉; 替换鞋钉; 防滑喷雾和松香
ro-RO: Îmbrăcăminte și accesorii > Accesorii pentru încălțăminte > Crampoane pentru încălțăminte: Plăcuțe adezive antiderapante; Crampoane pentru gheață și zăpadă; Crampoane și ținte de schimb; Sprayuri de tracțiune și colofoniu
it: Abbigliamento e accessori > Accessori per scarpe > Solette per la tenuta delle scarpe: Cuscinetti antiscivolo adesivi; Ramponcini per ghiaccio e neve; Tacchetti e chiodi di ricambio; Spray antiscivolo e pece
el: Ένδυση και αξεσουάρ > Αξεσουάρ παπουτσιών > Αντιολισθητικά παπούτσια: Αυτοκόλλητα αντιολισθητικά πατάκια; Καρφιά πάγου και χιονιού; Ανταλλακτικά καρφιά; Σπρέι πρόσφυσης και ρητίνη
zh-TW: 服飾與配件 > 鞋類配件 > 鞋子防滑墊: 黏著式防滑貼; 冰雪防滑鞋套與冰爪; 替換鞋釘; 防滑噴霧與松香水
de: Bekleidung & Accessoires > Schuh-Accessoires > Schuhspikes: Anti-Rutsch-Pads für Schuhe; Eisspikes; Ersatzstollen & -spikes; Anti-Rutsch-Sprays & Kolophonium
ru: Одежда, обувь и аксессуары > Аксессуары для обуви > Противоскользящие накладки: Противоскользящие накладки на подошву; Ледоступы; Сменные шипы; Спреи от скольжения и канифоль
en: Apparel & Accessories > Shoe Accessories > Shoe Grips: Adhesive Grip Pads & Treads; Ice & Snow Cleats; Replacement Studs & Spikes; Traction Sprays & Rosin
fi: Vaatteet ja asusteet > Kenkätarvikkeet > Kengänpohjat: Liukuestetarrat; Liukuesteet; Vaihtonastat ja -piikit; Pitosuihkeet ja hartsi
vi: Quần áo & Phụ kiện > Phụ kiện giày > Miếng dán đế giày chống trượt: Tấm dán chống trượt; Đế đinh đi tuyết và băng; Đinh tán và gai thay thế; Xịt và nhựa thông tăng độ bám
lt-LT: Apranga ir aksesuarai > Batų aksesuarai > Grandinės batams: Lipnūs sukibimo padeliai ir protektoriai; Ledo ir sniego antbačiai su dygliukais; Atsarginiai dygliukai ir smeigės; Traukos purškikliai ir kanifolija
bg-BG: Облекло и аксесоари > Аксесоари за обувки > Противоплъзгащи подметки: Лепящи подложки и протектори; Котки за лед и сняг; Резервни бодли и шипове; Спрейове за сцепление и колофон
pt-BR: Vestuário e acessórios > Acessórios para sapatos > Solas exteriores: Adesivos antiderrapantes para solado; Grampos para gelo e neve; Cravos e travas de reposição; Sprays de tração e resina
cs: Oblečení a doplňky > Doplňky k obuvi > Nesmeky: Lepicí protiskluzové podložky a nášlapy; Nesmeky na led a sníh; Náhradní špunty a hroty; Protiskluzové spreje a kalafuna
th: เสื้อผ้าและเครื่องประดับ > อุปกรณ์รองเท้า > ที่จับรองเท้า: แผ่นกาวติดพื้นรองเท้ากันลื่น; ปุ่มเกาะน้ำแข็งและหิมะ; ปุ่มและหมุดรองเท้าอะไหล่; สเปรย์และยางสนกันลื่น
nl: Kleding en accessoires > Accessoires voor schoenen > Schoengrepen: Zelfklevende antislippads; IJs- en sneeuwspikes; Vervangende noppen en spikes; Antislipsprays en hars
ja: ファッション・アクセサリー > 靴用品 > 靴アウトソール: 粘着滑り止めパッド・グリップ; スノースパイク・アイゼン; 交換用スタッド・スパイク; 滑り止めスプレー・松やに
sv: Kläder och accessoarer > Skotillbehör > Skogrepp: Självhäftande glidskydd; Broddar; Utbytesdubbar och -spikar; Halkspray och harts
hr-HR: Odjeća i modni dodaci > Dodaci za obuću > Neklizajući dodatak za potplat: Ljepljive podloge i gazišta; Kramponi za led i snijeg; Zamjenski klinovi i šiljci; Sprejevi za trenje i smola
tr: Kıyafet ve Aksesuarlar > Ayakkabı Aksesuarları > Ayakkabı Kaymazları: Yapışkan kaydırmaz pedler ve tabanlar; Buz ve kar kramponları; Yedek krampon çivileri; Kaydırmaz spreyler ve reçineler
ko: 의류/액세서리 > 신발 액세서리 > 논슬립 신발 패드: 접착식 미끄럼 방지 패드 및 트레드; 빙설용 아이젠; 교체용 스터드 및 스파이크; 마찰 스프레이 및 송진
sl-SI: Oblačila in dodatki > Dodatki za obutev > Protizdrsni podplati: Lepilne blazinice in tekalne plasti za oprijem; Čevlji za led in sneg; Nadomestni čepi in konice; Spreji in smole za oprijem
da: Tøj og tilbehør > Tilbehør til sko > Skogreb: Skridsikre såler og puder; Skopigge til is og sne; Løse dupper og pigge; Skridspray og harpiks
es: Ropa y accesorios > Accesorios para zapatos > Almohadillas antideslizantes para zapatos: Almohadillas y cintas antideslizantes adhesivas; Crampones para hielo y nieve; Tacos y clavos de repuesto; Sprays de tracción y resina